Wisconsin, session 2025, SB904.
do enact as follows:SB904,13Section 1. The treatment of 15.08 (1m) (b) of the statutes by 2021 Wisconsin 4Act 23 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 130. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,25Section 2. The treatment of 15.405 (6) (b) of the statutes by 2023 Wisconsin 6Act 87 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 88. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,31Section 3. The treatment of 25.18 (1) (a) of the statutes by 2021 Wisconsin 2Act 177 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 267. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,43Section 4. The treatment of 25.18 (1) (f) of the statutes by 2021 Wisconsin 4Act 177 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 267. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,55Section 5. The treatment of 25.18 (1) (m) of the statutes by 2021 Wisconsin 6Act 177 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 267. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,67Section 6. The treatment of 40.05 (4) (ah) 3. and 4. of the statutes by 2021 8Wisconsin Act 240 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 245. Both treatments 9stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,710Section 7. The treatment of 48.345 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes by 2023 11Wisconsin Act 119 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 224. Both treatments 12stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,813Section 8. The treatment of 48.981 (2m) (b) 1. of the statutes by 2021 14Wisconsin Act 23 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 130. Both treatments 15stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,916Section 9. The treatment of 49.45 (9r) (a) 7. b. of the statutes by 2021 17Wisconsin Act 23, section 71, is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 251. Both 18treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,101Section 10. The treatment of 66.0602 (1) (d) of the statutes by 2023 2Wisconsin Act 135 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 136. Both treatments 3stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,114Section 11. The treatment of 66.0602 (3) (dq) 1. (intro.) of the statutes by 52023 Wisconsin Act 135 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 136. Both 6treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,127Section 12. The treatment of 66.0602 (3) (dv) of the statutes by 2023 8Wisconsin Act 135 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 136. Both treatments 9stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,1310Section 13. The treatment of 66.1105 (7) (ak) 2. of the statutes by 2023 11Wisconsin Act 137 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 138. Both treatments 12stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,1413Section 14. The treatment of 71.88 (2) (b) of the statutes by 2021 Wisconsin 14Act 127 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 262. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,1515Section 15. The treatment of 102.16 (1m) (a) of the statutes by 2025 16Wisconsin Act 15 is not repealed by 2025 Wisconsin Act 33. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,1617Section 16. The treatment of 102.18 (1) (bg) 1. of the statutes by 2025 18Wisconsin Act 15 is not repealed by 2025 Wisconsin Act 33. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,171Section 17. The treatment of 102.44 (2) of the statutes by 2025 Wisconsin 2Act 15, section 303, is not repealed by 2025 Wisconsin Act 33. Both treatments 3stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,184Section 18. The treatment of 108.02 (13) (k) of the statutes by 2021 5Wisconsin Act 231 is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 239. Both treatments 6stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,197Section 19. The treatment of 108.04 (8) (b) of the statutes by 2017 Wisconsin 8Act 157 is not repealed by 2017 Wisconsin Act 366. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,209Section 20. The treatment of 139.82 (6) of the statutes by 2023 Wisconsin 10Act 73 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 150. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,2111Section 21. The treatment of 146.81 (1) (c) of the statutes by 2023 Wisconsin 12Act 87 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 88. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,2213Section 22. The treatment of 146.81 (1) (dg) of the statutes by 2021 14Wisconsin Act 23, section 71, is not repealed by 2021 Wisconsin Act 251. Both 15treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance.SB904,2316Section 23. The treatment of 146.997 (1) (d) 3. of the statutes by 2023 17Wisconsin Act 87 is not repealed by 2023 Wisconsin Act 88. Both treatments stand.Note: There is no conflict of substance. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb904 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb904 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB904 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB904 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB904: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting